District of Columbia statutes.
47-171

Repealed

Definitions.

Repealed.

June 14, 1994, D.C. Law 10-128, § 201, 41 DCR 2096
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 406(b), 48 DCR 334

Mayor authorized to issue rules: Section 208 of D.C. Law 10-128 provided that the Mayor may issue rules, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, necessary for the proper administration of this chapter.

Section 410(e) of D.C. Law 13-305 provided: “Section 406(b), (d), (f), (l), (n), (o), (r), (v), (x)through (aa), (cc), (ff), (gg), (ll), (pp), (vv), (ww), (aaa), (ccc), (eee), and (ggg) shall apply as of January 1, 2001.”

1981 Ed., § 47-171.